trunk/incubator/apertium-en-la.la.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
  Latin morphological analyser for Apertium
  
  Resources for Latin are bountiful...
  much of this lexicon was imported from AFGL's Latin lexicon
  http://www.agfl.cs.ru.nl/lat/generating.html

 # Latin grammar and lexicon constructed by
 # Cornelis H.A. Koster for Tineke E.Koster
 # as part of the AGFL project
 # C.H.A. Koster, dec 2003 
 
#   This grammar is free software; you can use it, redistribute it
#   and/or modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
#   License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
#   version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#   This grammar is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
#   Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#   You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#   License along with this library; if not, write to the Free Software
#   Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307 USA
 
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="abl"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>

    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Prepositions -->  
    <pardef n="ab__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="et__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ut__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quasi__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>que</l>
          <r><j/>que<s n="enc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Declension 1 -->
    <pardef n="aqu/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Corneli/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="prae"><i>prae</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="adversus"><i>adversus</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="apud"><i>apud</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circa"><i>circa</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circum"><i>circum</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="citra"><i>citra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="contra"><i>contra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cum"><i>cum</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ex"><i>ex</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gratia"><i>gratia</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="intra"><i>intra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="procul"><i>procul</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sine"><i>sine</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="trans"><i>trans</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="et"><i>et</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ac"><i>ac</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="atque"><i>atque</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aut"><i>aut</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nec"><i>nec</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="neque"><i>neque</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vel"><i>vel</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cur"><i>cur</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="donec"><i>donec</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etiamsi"><i>etiamsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etsi"><i>etsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nisi"><i>nisi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nonne"><i>nonne</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="posteaquam"><i>posteaquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="postquam"><i>postquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="praeterquam"><i>praeterquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="priusquam"><i>priusquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quamvis"><i>quamvis</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quia"><i>quia</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sicut"><i>sicut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ut"><i>ut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aliquamdiu"><i>aliquamdiu</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amplius"><i>amplius</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="audacter"><i>audacter</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cito"><i>cito</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ecce"><i>ecce</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gradatim"><i>gradatim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="immo"><i>immo</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ita"><i>ita</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mox"><i>mox</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="numquam"><i>numquam</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="praeterea"><i>praeterea</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="prius"><i>prius</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="semper"><i>semper</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="falso"><i>falso</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="universe"><i>universe</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="verumptamen"><i>verumptamen</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="libenter"><i>libenter</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amicitia"><i>amiciti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ara"><i>ar</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="Cornelia"><i>Corneli</i><par n="Corneli/a__np"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="abundantia"><i>abundanti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="audacia"><i>audaci</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="capella"><i>capell</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="cithara"><i>cithar</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="dea"><i>de</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="famula"><i>famul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="iniuria"><i>iniuri</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="luna"><i>lun</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="neglegentia"><i>neglegenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="plaga"><i>plag</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="rota"><i>rot</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="stilla"><i>still</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="tunica"><i>tunic</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="vinea"><i>vine</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
